Maryland, session 2026, HB0713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Estates and Trusts
2–108.
(i) (1) [Each] BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, EACH of the judges of the
Court for Cecil County shall receive an annual [compensation of:
(i) $5,500 for fiscal year 2015;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0713*

HOUSE BILL 713
(ii) $6,500 for fiscal year 2016;
(iii) $7,500 for fiscal year 2017; and
(iv) $8,750 for fiscal year 2018 and each subsequent fiscal year]
SALARY AS DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL, BUT NOT LESS THAN $11,000.
(2) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE CHIEF JUDGE SHALL
RECEIVE ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION AS DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL,
BUT NOT LESS THAN $1,500 ANNUALLY.
[(2)] (3) Each judge shall also receive an allowance for traveling expenses
[of] AS DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL, BUT NOT LESS THAN $1,500 annually,
to be paid quarterly by the county.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the judges of the Orphans’ Court for Cecil County while
serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions
of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of the judges of the Orphans’ Court for
Cecil County shall take effect at the beginning of the next following term of office. This
limitation does not apply to an individual appointed or elected after the effective date of
this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.